Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 3. Sex Offender Registration; Law Enforcement Notification
§ 5411c.
Active community notification by the Department of Public Safety, the Department of Corrections, and local law enforcement.

Notwithstanding other provisions to the contrary, the Department, the Department of Corrections, and any authorized local law enforcement agency are authorized to notify members of the public at their discretion about any sex offender whose information is required to be posted on the Internet in accordance with section 5411a of this title.

The Department, the Department of Corrections, and any authorized local law enforcement agency are authorized to notify members of the public at their discretion about a sex offender whose information is not required to be posted on the Internet in accordance with section 5411a of this title only under circumstances that constitute a compelling risk to public safety and only after consultation with the Vermont Crime Information Center and the Department of Corrections.

Registry information shall not be released under this section unless it is released pursuant to written protocols governing the manner and circumstances of the release developed by the Department, the Department of Corrections, or an authorized law enforcement agency. The protocols shall include consultation between the department or agency releasing the information and the department of corrections’ staff member responsible for supervising the offender.

Active community notification regarding registered sex offenders who may pose a danger to members of the community is an important public safety tool that the General Assembly intends for authorized agencies to use at their discretion in accordance with this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added 2005, No. 192 (Adj. Sess.), § 27, eff. May 26, 2006.

§ 5411d.
Designation of noncompliant high-risk sex offender.

Prior to releasing a person from total confinement, the Department of Corrections shall designate the person as a noncompliant high-risk sex offender if the person meets all of the following criteria:

is incarcerated on or after June 7, 2007 for lewd and lascivious conduct with a child as defined in section 2602 of this title, sexual assault as defined in section 3252 of this title, aggravated sexual assault as defined in section 3253 of this title, or any attempt to commit a crime listed herein, or a comparable offense in another jurisdiction of the United States;

is not subject to indeterminate life sentences under section 3271 of this title;

is designated as a high risk sex offender pursuant to section 5411b of this title; and

is noncompliant with sex offender treatment as defined by Department of Corrections’ directives.

Noncompliant high-risk sex offenders shall report to the Department as follows:

In person, within 15 days from the date of release from Department of Corrections’ supervision, and within every 30 days thereafter.

Prior to any change of address. However, if the change of address is unanticipated, the offender shall report within one day of the change of address.

Prior to enrollment in or separation from any postsecondary educational institution. However, if the change in school status is unanticipated, the offender shall report within one day of the change.

Within one day of any change in a place of employment.

In addition to the Registry information required in section 5403 of this title, a noncompliant high-risk sex offender shall provide the Department with the make, model, color, registration, and license plate number of any vehicle the person operates prior to operation. An offender found in operation of a vehicle not on the list provided to the Department shall be considered to be in violation of this subsection.

The Department shall arrange for the noncompliant high-risk sex offender to have his or her digital photograph updated annually for purposes of the electronic Registry as provided in section 5411a of this title. An offender who is requested by the Department to report to the Department or a local law enforcement agency for the purpose of being photographed for the Internet Registry shall comply with the request within 30 days.

The Department shall conduct periodic unannounced Registry compliance checks on noncompliant high-risk sex offenders to verify the accuracy of Registry information. The Department may enter into an agreement with a local law enforcement agency to perform duties under this subsection and under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, but shall maintain responsibility for compliance with this subsection.

A noncompliant high-risk sex offender may petition the Criminal Division of the Superior Court to be relieved from the heightened Registry requirements in this section once every five years from the date of designation. The offender shall have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that he or she:
(f) (1) A noncompliant high-risk sex offender may petition the Criminal Division of the Superior Court to be relieved from the heightened Registry requirements in this section once every five years from the date of designation. The offender shall have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that he or she:

no longer qualifies as a high-risk offender as defined in section 5401 of this title and rules adopted by the Department of Corrections in accordance with section 5411b of this title; and

has complied with and completed sex offender treatment as provided by Department of Corrections’ directives.

The Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure shall apply to these proceedings.

If the court finds that the offender is not high risk and has successfully completed treatment, the court shall order that the offender is no longer considered a noncompliant high risk offender and is subsequently relieved from the heightened registry requirements of this section; however, the offender shall still continue to comply with Sex Offender Registry and other requirements as provided elsewhere in this subchapter.

A noncompliant high-risk sex offender who knowingly fails to comply with any of the Registry requirements under this section shall be imprisoned for not less than five years and a maximum term of life and, in addition, may be fined not more than $50,000.00. A sentence may be suspended in whole or in part, or the person may be eligible for parole or release on conditional reentry or furlough, provided the person is subject to intensive supervision by the Department of Corrections.
(g) (1) A noncompliant high-risk sex offender who knowingly fails to comply with any of the Registry requirements under this section shall be imprisoned for not less than five years and a maximum term of life and, in addition, may be fined not more than $50,000.00. A sentence may be suspended in whole or in part, or the person may be eligible for parole or release on conditional reentry or furlough, provided the person is subject to intensive supervision by the Department of Corrections.

In a criminal proceeding for violating any of the Registry requirements under this section, a defendant shall be prohibited from challenging his or her status as a noncompliant high-risk sex offender.

A noncompliant high-risk sex offender convicted of violating this section shall be sentenced under section 3271 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added 2007, No. 77, § 10, eff. June 7, 2007; amended 2009, No. 154, § 238.

§ 5412.
Immunity.

The Department, the Department of Corrections, any authorized local law enforcement agency, and their employees shall be immune from liability in carrying out the provisions under this subchapter except in instances of gross negligence or willful misconduct, provided that the agencies complied with the rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added 1995, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1996; amended 2003, No. 157 (Adj. Sess.), § 9; 2005, No. 83, § 14; 2005, No. 192 (Adj. Sess.), § 28, eff. May 26, 2006.

§ 5413.
Expungement of records.

A person whose conviction of a sex offense is reversed and dismissed shall not be required to register for that conviction under the provisions of this subchapter and any information about that conviction contained in the Registry shall be removed and destroyed. If any information about that conviction was provided to any person or agency under subsection 5402(b) of this subchapter, that person or agency shall be notified that the conviction was reversed and shall be required to remove and destroy the information. If the person whose conviction is reversed and dismissed has more than one entry in the Registry, only the entry related to the dismissed case shall be removed and destroyed.

HISTORY:

Added 1995, No. 124 (Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1996.

§ 5414.
Participation in national sex offender registration.

The Department shall participate in the National Sex Offender Registry Program managed by the Federal Bureau of Investigation in accordance with guidelines issued by the U.S. Attorney General, including transmission of current address information and other information on registrants to the extent provided by the guidelines.

HISTORY:

Added 2001, No. 49, § 11, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

§ 5415.
Enforcement; special investigation units.

Special investigation units, created pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 1940, shall be responsible for the investigation of violations of this chapter’s Registry requirements and are authorized to conduct in-person Registry compliance checks in a time, place, and manner it deems appropriate in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter. This section shall not be construed to prohibit local law enforcement from enforcing the provisions of this chapter.

On or before November 1, 2019, and annually thereafter, local law enforcement agencies shall report to the Vermont Crime Information Center about any in-person Registry compliance checks that the agency has conducted during the preceding 12 months. The report shall include the total number of in-person compliance checks conducted during the 12-month period, the number of offenders who were in compliance, the number of offenders who were out of compliance, and the reasons for being out of compliance.

The Department of Public Safety shall report to the Senate and House Committees on Judiciary on or before December 15, 2009, and annually thereafter, regarding its efforts under this section.

HISTORY:

Added 2009, No. 1, § 16, eff. March 4, 2009; amended 2019, No. 77, § 17, eff. June 19, 2019.

§ 5416.
Persons subject to erroneous Sex Offender Registry requirements; petition to correct.

A person may petition the court for an order declaring that the person has been inadvertently subject to erroneous Sex Offender Registry requirements and directing the Department of Public Safety to correct the error. The petitioner shall provide notice of the petition to the State’s Attorney or the Attorney General, who shall be the respondent in the matter.

A petition filed under this section shall include:

the court’s order issued under subdivision 5403(b)(2) of this title to comply with Sex Offender Registry requirements, if available; and

the factual basis for the petitioner’s allegation that he or she was subject to an erroneous Sex Offender Registry requirement.

The court shall grant a petition filed under this section if it finds that the petitioner has demonstrated by a preponderance of the evidence that he or she was by court order subject to an erroneous Sex Offender Registry requirement. As used in this subsection, “erroneous Sex Offender Registry requirement” includes the person’s name being erroneously placed on the Sex Offender Registry or the Internet Sex Offender Registry, or the person being erroneously subject to lifetime registration under subsection 5407(f) of this title.

If a petition filed under this section is granted, the court shall enter an order declaring that the person had been inadvertently subject to erroneous Sex Offender Registry requirements. The court shall provide the order to the Department of Public Safety and direct the Department to take any action necessary to correct the error, including, if appropriate, removing the person’s name from the Sex Offender Registry and the Internet Sex Offender Registry.

If the court denies a petition filed under this section, no further petition shall be filed by the person with respect to the alleged error.
(e) (1) If the court denies a petition filed under this section, no further petition shall be filed by the person with respect to the alleged error.

This subsection shall not apply if the petition is based on:

newly discovered evidence;

an expungement order issued under chapter 230 of this title;

a successful petition under chapter 182 of this title (innocence protection); or

a successful petition for postconviction relief.

HISTORY:

Added 2015, No. 31, § 5.